Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB395.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Plumber and Plumbing Contractors Licensure Act.Section 102. Declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Nothing in this act shall be construed to change the manner in which an authority having jurisdiction currently requires permitting for work to any portion of a plumbing 20250SB0395PN0442 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system on the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Nothing in this act shall be intended to compel an authority having jurisdiction to adopt additional or expanded permitting requirements to install or modify any portion of a plumbing system beyond the current requirements on the effective date of this paragraph.(3) If an authority having jurisdiction requires a plumbing permit to install or modify any portion of a plumbing system, only an individual who is licensed under this act to provide plumbing services shall facilitate the work.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Apprentice plumber." An individual who is registered as an apprentice under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act, and who is licensed by the board as an individual whose principal occupation is learning and assisting in the performance of plumbing services."Board." The State Board of Plumbing Contractors established under section 301(a)."Conviction." The term includes a judgment, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Journeyman plumber." An individual who is licensed by the board to assist a master plumber with the performance of plumbing services."Master plumber" or "licensed plumbing contractor." An 20250SB0395PN0442 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual who has been licensed by the board and who is authorized to perform plumbing services and to supervise plumbing services provided by an apprentice plumber or a journeyman plumber."Minor repairs." The repair of an existing plumbing fixture, including the replacement of faucets or valves or parts of faucets or valves, the clearance of stoppages, the stopping of leaks without replacement of water, drainage or vent piping, the relieving of frozen pipes or other minor replacement or repair of existing plumbing fixtures."Plumbing services." The installation, maintenance, extension, erection, repair or alteration of piping, plumbing fixtures, plumbing appliances and plumbing apparatus in connection with sanitary drainage, storm piping and facilities and building sewers to the facility's or sewer's final connection to an approved point of disposal, venting systems, public and private water supply systems of a premises or building within the property line and to the final connection with an approved supply system. The term also includes the installation, maintenance, extension, erection, repair or alteration of piping, plumbing fixtures and plumbing apparatus used for storm piping and facilities and building sewers, liquid waste or sewage.CHAPTER 3STATE BOARD OF PLUMBING CONTRACTORSSection 301. State Board of Plumbing Contractors.(a) Establishment.--The State Board of Plumbing Contractors is established in the department.(b) Composition.--The board shall consist of:(1) The Secretary of State or a designee.20250SB0395PN0442 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Two public members with no plumbing industry affiliation.(3) Professional members as follows:(i) The following professional members, who must have been actively engaged in providing plumbing services in this Commonwealth for at least 10 years immediately preceding appointment and, except as provided in Chapter 5 (relating to licensure), must be licensed under this act as master plumbers in a jurisdiction of the Commonwealth that provides testing of master plumbers satisfactory to the board:(A) Two professional members who reside in or represent an entity legally based in a county of the first class.(B) Two professional members who reside in or represent an entity legally based in a county of the second class.(C) Two professional members who reside in or represent an entity legally based in any county of the Commonwealth excluding counties of the first and second class.(ii) The professional members under subparagraph (i) shall be subject to the following:(A) Three members subject to collective bargaining agreements.(B) Three members not subject to collective bargaining agreements.(c) Initial meeting.--The board shall meet within 30 days after the appointment of its first members and shall set up operating procedures and develop application forms for 20250SB0395PN0442 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensure. It shall be the responsibility of the board to circulate the forms and educate the public regarding the requirements of this act and the provision of plumbing services in this Commonwealth.(d) Appointments and term of membership.--Professional and public members shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice, consent and confirmation of the Senate. Professional and public members shall be citizens of the United States and residents of this Commonwealth. Except as provided in subsection (e), professional and public members shall serve a term of four years or until a successor has been appointed and qualified. If a member dies, resigns or is otherwise disqualified during the term of office, a successor shall be appointed in the same way and with the same qualifications and shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term. A professional or public member may not be eligible to hold more than three consecutive terms.(e) Initial appointment.--For professional and public members initially appointed to the board under this act, the term of office shall be as follows:(1) Two members shall serve for a term of four years.(2) Six members shall serve for a term of three years.(3) One member shall serve for a term of two years.(f) Quorum.--A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. A member may not be counted as part of a quorum or vote on an issue unless the member is physically in attendance at the meeting. Virtual meetings may be conducted as deemed necessary by the board. Only current board members maintaining the requirements for appointment shall be entitled to a vote.(g) Chairperson.--The board shall select annually a 20250SB0395PN0442 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chairperson from among its members. The sitting chairperson may be reselected at the pleasure of the board.(h) Expenses.--With the exception of the Secretary of State, a member of the board shall receive $100 per diem when attending to the work of the board. A member shall also receive the amount of reasonable travel, hotel and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties in accordance with Commonwealth regulations.(i) Forfeiture.--A professional or public member who fails to attend three consecutive meetings shall forfeit the member's seat unless the Secretary of State, on written request from the member, finds that the member should be excused from a meeting because of illness or the death of a family member.(j) Frequency of meetings.--The board shall meet at least six times a year in the City of Harrisburg or an alternate location approved by the Secretary of State that may be suggested at the majority consensus of the board. Additional meetings may be scheduled if deemed necessary to conduct the business of the board.Section 302. Powers and duties of board.The board shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To provide for and regulate the licensing of individuals engaged in providing plumbing services.(2) To issue, renew, reinstate, decline to renew, suspend and revoke licenses under this act.(3) To administer and enforce the provisions of this act.(4) To approve professional testing organizations to administer tests to qualified applicants for licensure under this act. Written, oral or practical examinations shall be 20250SB0395PN0442 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prepared and administered by a qualified and approved professional testing organization. The examinations shall be approved by the board then administered by a qualifying and approved professional testing organization approved by the board.(5) To investigate applications for licensure and to determine the eligibility of an individual applying for licensure.(6) To promulgate and enforce regulations, not inconsistent with this act, as necessary only to carry into effect the provisions of this act. This paragraph includes the setting of fees. Regulations shall be adopted in conformity with the provisions of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(7) To keep minutes and records of all the board's proceedings.(8) To keep and maintain a registry of individuals licensed by the board. The board shall provide access to the registry to the public, including making the registry available on a publicly accessible Internet website. The registry shall contain the home improvement contractor registration number required by the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act, and provide access information for the website containing registration information if the contractor is required to be registered as a residential home improvement contractor.(9) To submit annually to the department an estimate of 20250SB0395PN0442 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 financial requirements of the board for the board's administrative, legal and other expenses.(10) To submit annually a report to the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include a description of the types of complaints received, the status of cases, the action that has been taken and the length of time from initial complaint to final resolution.(11) To submit annually to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, 30 days after the Governor has submitted a budget to the General Assembly, a copy of the budget request for the upcoming fiscal year that the board previously submitted to the department.CHAPTER 5LICENSURESection 501. Licensure.(a) Prohibition.--An individual may not provide plumbing services, offer himself or herself for employment as an individual who may provide plumbing services or hold himself or herself out as an individual authorized to perform plumbing services unless licensed under this act.(b) Business entities.--An individual, corporation, partnership, firm or other entity shall not:(1) Employ an individual to provide plumbing services or direct an individual to provide plumbing services unless the individual is licensed under this act.(2) Use the term "licensed plumbing contractor" in connection with the individual, corporation, partnership, 20250SB0395PN0442 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 firm or other entity unless at least one full-time employee or the owner of the entity is licensed as a master plumber under this act. If the employment of the full-time employee holding the master plumber license for the entity is terminated or otherwise interrupted for any reason, a qualified replacement must be named before any additional permit is issued to the entity and the entity must notify the board of the change.(c) Title.--An individual who holds a license as a master plumber shall have the right to use the title "licensed plumbing contractor" and the abbreviation "L.P.C." No other individual may use the title "licensed plumbing contractor" or the abbreviation "L.P.C." Except as provided in subsection (d), no individual may hold himself or herself out as being authorized to provide plumbing services.(d) Exceptions.--The following exceptions apply:(1) A journeyman plumber or apprentice plumber may hold himself or herself out as being authorized to perform plumbing services if the journeyman plumber or apprentice plumber is employed by and works under the direction and supervision of a licensed plumbing contractor or master plumber.(2) An individual who is not in the business of providing plumbing services and who performs minor repairs in a residence may not be required to obtain a license under this act. The individuals shall not be permitted to use the title of "licensed plumbing contractor" or "master plumber" or the abbreviation "L.P.C."(e) Responsibility.--A licensed plumbing contractor or master plumber shall assume full responsibility for the plumbing 20250SB0395PN0442 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services irrespective of whether the plumbing services were performed by the licensed plumbing contractor, master plumber, journeyman plumber or an apprentice plumber employed by and working under the direction and supervision of the licensed plumbing contractor or master plumber. This subsection includes the responsibility of the licensed plumbing contractor or master plumber to ensure conformance with safety standards and applicable plumbing codes, including plumbing codes for first class counties and second class counties.Section 502. Qualifications.(a) Master plumber.--To be eligible to apply for licensure as a master plumber, an applicant must:(1) Be at least 18 years of age.(2) Submit proof satisfactory to the board that the applicant has provided plumbing services for not less than five years prior to application. Of the minimum five years' experience required, not less than five years shall have been as a master plumber or not less than one year shall have been as a journeyman plumber and not less than four years shall have been as an apprentice plumber, all in a jurisdiction or municipality approved by the board. In lieu of the minimum five years' experience under this paragraph, an applicant may submit proof satisfactory to the board that the individual has sufficient training and experience to sit for the examination. The proof shall be either accepted or rejected by the board on a case-by-case basis and the board's decisions shall be considered final.(3) Pay the fee set by the board.(4) Pass the examination provided by the board.(5) Provide a current certificate or insurance verifying 20250SB0395PN0442 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 workers compensation coverage and of liability insurance in the amount of $500,000.(b) Journeyman plumber.--To be eligible for licensure as a journeyman plumber, an applicant must:(1) Be at least 18 years of age.(2) Submit proof satisfactory to the board that the applicant has:(i) provided plumbing services for not less than four years as a journeyman or an apprentice plumber in a jurisdiction or municipality approved by the board and has served not less than 8,000 hours as an apprentice plumber;(ii) satisfactorily completed not less than 576 hours of related technical education at an accredited school approved by the board and the department; and(iii) submitted proof, in lieu of the four years' experience as required under subparagraph (i), of the applicant's experience satisfactory to the board that the individual has sufficient training and experience to sit for the examination. This proof shall be either accepted or rejected by the board on a case-by-case basis and the board's decision regarding this proof shall be considered final.(3) Provide a certificate of completion of apprenticeship from the department.(4) Pay the fee set by the board.(5) Pass the examination approved by the board.(c) Additional requirement.--In addition to the other requirements of this section, an individual applying for licensure as a master plumber or a journeyman plumber who 20250SB0395PN0442 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provides or will provide plumbing services in either a county of the first class or a county of the second class must pass an examination on the plumbing code of the respective county.(d) Apprentice plumber.--To be eligible for licensure as an apprentice plumber, an applicant must:(1) Be at least 16 years of age.(2) Register with the department as specified under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act. The apprentice plumber shall submit proof of current registration to the board.(3) Pay the fee set by the board not to exceed $20 biannually.(e) Renewal of license of apprentice plumber.--In the case of an apprentice plumber applying for renewal of a license when registration under subsection (d) has expired or otherwise lapsed, the apprentice plumber shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board that the apprentice plumber has renewed the registration. Failure to notify the board within 30 days that the registration has expired or otherwise lapsed shall subject the apprentice plumber to disciplinary action. In the case of an apprentice plumber whose registration has expired or otherwise lapsed, the license shall be immediately placed on inactive status by the board. The board shall promulgate regulations in order to carry out the provisions of this subsection, including regulations specifying the evidence necessary to demonstrate renewal of the registration.(f) Waiver of examination.--Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b), the board shall grant a license to an individual applying to become either a master plumber or a journeyman plumber without examination if the individual meets 20250SB0395PN0442 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all of the following requirements:(1) The individual applies within 18 months of the effective date of this paragraph.(2) The individual meets the requirements of age and pays the required fee.(3) For an individual applying for a license as a master plumber under this subsection, the individual submits proof satisfactory to the board of any of the following:(i) five years of prior experience immediately preceding application providing plumbing services in a jurisdiction or municipality approved by the board;(ii) five consecutive years of possession of a current business license as a plumber or an entity providing plumbing services from a jurisdiction or municipality approved by the board; or(iii) successful completion of a test administered by a jurisdiction, municipality or an agency approved by the board or the respective county of the first or second class, as appropriate to working as a licensed plumbing contractor or journeyman plumber in those specific counties or cities.(g) Proof.--Proof submitted to the board under this section shall be accepted or rejected by the board on a case-by-case basis and the board's decision regarding this proof shall be considered final.(h) Convictions prohibited.--The board may not issue a license to an individual who has been convicted of an offense that constitutes a felony, in a court of law of the United States or any other state, territory or country unless any of the following have occurred:20250SB0395PN0442 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) at least five years have elapsed from the date of conviction;(2) the individual satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the individual has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction to ensure that licensure of the individual should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations; or(3) the individual otherwise satisfies the qualifications under this act. An individual's statement on the application declaring the absence of a conviction shall be deemed satisfactory evidence of the absence of a conviction unless the board has evidence to the contrary.Section 503. Continuing education.(a) Regulations.--The board shall adopt, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this act establishing continuing education to be met by individuals licensed as master plumbers and journeyman plumbers. Regulations shall include any fees necessary for the board to carry out the board's responsibilities under this section. The board may waive all or part of the continuing education requirement for a master plumber or a journeyman plumber who shows evidence satisfactory to the board that the individual was unable to complete the requirement due to illness, emergency, military service or other hardship. The waiver will be accepted or rejected by the board on a case-by-case basis and the board's decision regarding the proof shall be considered final. All courses, materials, locations and instructors shall be approved by the board.20250SB0395PN0442 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Twelve-hour requirement.--Beginning with the licensure period designated by regulation, an individual applying for renewal of a license as a master plumber shall be required to obtain 12 hours of continuing education during the two calendar years immediately preceding the application for renewal.(c) Eight-hour requirement.--Beginning with the licensure period designated by regulation, an individual applying for renewal of a license as a journeyman plumber shall be required to obtain eight hours of continuing education during the two calendar years immediately preceding the application for renewal.Section 504. Plumbing contractors in other states.(a) Requirement.--For an individual to be eligible to apply for a license as a master plumber or a journeyman plumber under subsection (b), the other state, territory or possession of the United States must provide an opportunity for reciprocal licensure that is substantially similar to the opportunity provided by the Commonwealth under this section.(b) Reciprocity established.--Subject to subsection (a), the board may issue a license without examination to an individual who is licensed as a master plumber or journeyman plumber in another state, territory or possession of the United States if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The individual meets the age requirements.(2) The individual pays the required fee.(3) The individual demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the individual meets the experience requirement for master plumbers and journeyman plumbers, as appropriate.(4) The individual provides evidence satisfactory to the 20250SB0395PN0442 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board that the individual has passed an examination in another jurisdiction demonstrating knowledge of a plumbing code.(c) Counties of the first or second class.--An individual applying for a license as a master plumber or journeyman plumber under this section who provides or will provide plumbing services in either a county of the first class or a county of the second class must pass an examination administered by the respective county on the plumbing code of the respective county.Section 505. Duration of license.(a) Biennial license.--A license issued under this act shall be on a biennial basis. The biennial expiration date shall be established by the board. Application for renewal of a license shall be forwarded to an individual holding a current license prior to the expiration date of the current two-year period. For individuals applying for licensure as an apprentice plumber, the application form must indicate whether registration as an apprentice under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act, has expired or otherwise lapsed before the biennial renewal cycle will expire.(b) Inactive status.--An individual licensed under this act may request an application for inactive status. The application form may be completed by the individual and returned to the board. Upon receipt of an application, the individual shall be maintained on inactive status without fee and shall be entitled to apply for a licensure renewal at any time. An individual who requests the board to activate the license of the individual who has been on inactive status shall, prior to receiving an active license, satisfy the board's requirements regarding continuing education and remit the required fee. In the case of an 20250SB0395PN0442 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 apprentice plumber who is placed on inactive status under section 502(e), the apprentice plumber shall provide evidence to the board of renewal of registration before the board may activate the license. The board shall promulgate regulations to carry into effect the provisions of this subsection.Section 506. Reporting of multiple licensure.A licensee who is also licensed to perform plumbing services in another state, municipality, territory or possession of the United States shall report this information to the board on the biennial registration application. Any disciplinary action taken in another state, municipality, territory, possession of the United States or country shall be reported to the board on the biennial registration application or within 90 days of final disposition, whichever is sooner. Multiple licensure shall be noted by the board on the individual's record, and the other state, municipality, territory, possession of the United States or country shall be notified by the board of disciplinary action taken against the licensee in this Commonwealth.Section 507. Prohibition.(a) Propane.--This act does not prohibit the installation, modification or replacement of propane-related systems or appliances by the owner, principal or employee of a propane distributor if the propane distributor is registered with the department under the act of June 19, 2002 (P.L.421, No.61), known as the Propane and Liquefied Petroleum Gas Act, and with the Attorney General under the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act.(b) Registration.--Nothing in this act or section shall relieve an individual, corporation, partnership, firm, licensed 20250SB0395PN0442 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plumbing contractor or master plumber from, if applicable under the act, maintaining registration with the Attorney General under the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act.CHAPTER 7ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENTSection 701. Fees, fines and civil penalties.(a) Fees.--All fees required under this act shall be fixed by the board by regulation and shall be subject to the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act. If the revenues raised by the fees, fines and civil penalties imposed under this act are not sufficient to meet expenditures over a two-year period, the board shall increase those fees by regulation so that projected revenues will meet or exceed projected expenditures.(b) Fee increase.--If the department determines that the fees established by the board under subsection (a) are inadequate to meet the enforcement required by this act, the department, after consultation with the board and subject to the Regulatory Review Act, shall increase the fees by regulation in an amount to ensure that revenues meet the required enforcement.(c) Account.--A restricted account is established in the General Fund that shall be known as the Plumbing Contractors Licensure Account. Beginning July 1, 2025, and thereafter, all money collected by the board shall be paid into the Plumbing Contractors Licensure Account. Money in the account is appropriated upon approval of the Governor for payment of the costs of processing licenses and renewals and for other general costs of board operations.(d) Renewal fee.--The board may charge a fee, as set by the board by regulation, for licensure, for renewing licensure and 20250SB0395PN0442 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for other administrative actions by the board as permitted by this act or by regulation.Section 702. Violations.(a) Criminal penalty.--An individual or the responsible officers or employees of a corporation, partnership, firm, entity, licensed plumbing contractor, master plumber or other entity violating a provision of this act or a regulation of the board commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,500 or to imprisonment for not more than six months for the first violation. For the second and each subsequent conviction, the individual shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $3,000 or to imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than one year, or both.(b) Civil penalty.--In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty under this act, the board by a vote of the majority may levy a civil penalty of up to $10,000 on any of the following:(1) A licensee who violates a provision of this act.(2) An individual who performs plumbing services in violation of this act without being properly licensed under this act.(3) The responsible officers or employees of a corporation, partnership, firm, entity, licensed plumbing contractor, master plumber or other entity violating a provision of this act.(c) Procedure.--The board shall levy the civil penalty specified in subsection (b) only after affording the accused the opportunity for a hearing as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).20250SB0395PN0442 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 703. Refusal, suspension or revocation of license.(a) Authorization.--The board may revoke, suspend or refuse to issue a license in a case where the board finds:(1) The licensee is or has been negligent or incompetent in the performance of plumbing services.(2) The licensee is or has been unable to perform plumbing services with reasonable skill and safety by reason of mental or physical illness or condition or physiological or psychological dependence upon alcohol, hallucinogenic or narcotic drugs or other drugs that tend to impair judgment or coordination, as long as dependence shall continue. In enforcing this paragraph, the board shall, upon probable cause, have authority to compel a licensee to submit to a mental or physical examination as designated by the board. After notice, hearing, adjudication and appeal, failure of a licensee to submit to the required examination when directed shall constitute an admission of the allegations unless failure is due to circumstances beyond the licensee's control, when a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. A licensee affected under this paragraph shall, at reasonable intervals, be afforded the opportunity to demonstrate that the licensee can resume competent, safe and skillful performance of plumbing services.(3) The licensee has violated any of the provisions of this act or a regulation of the board.(4) The licensee has committed fraud or deceit in:(i) the performance of plumbing services; or(ii) securing licensure.(5) An applicant has been convicted of an offense that 20250SB0395PN0442 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constitutes a felony, in a court of law of the United States or another state, territory or country unless any of the following have occurred:(i) at least five years have elapsed from the date of conviction;(ii) the individual satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the individual has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction so that licensure of the individual should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of the public or a substantial risk of further criminal violations; or(iii) the individual otherwise satisfies the qualifications under this act. An individual's statement on the application declaring the absence of a conviction shall be deemed satisfactory evidence of the absence of a conviction unless the board has evidence to the contrary.(6) The licensee's license was suspended or revoked or has received other disciplinary action by the proper licensing authority in another state, territory or possession of the United States or country.(7) With respect to a master plumber, the master plumber failed to properly direct and supervise a journeyman plumber or apprentice plumber. This paragraph includes failure to ensure compliance with safety standards and applicable plumbing codes.(8) The licensee falsely advertised or made misleading, deceptive, untrue or fraudulent material representations regarding licensure or the performance of plumbing services.(9) Unless waived by the board in accordance with 20250SB0395PN0442 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 503, the licensee failed to satisfy the continuing education requirements of this act.(b) Acts authorized.--When the board finds that the license of an individual may be refused, revoked or suspended under subsection (a), the board may:(1) Deny the application for a license.(2) Administer a public reprimand.(3) Revoke, suspend, limit or otherwise restrict a license.(4) Suspend enforcement of its finding and place a licensee on probation with the right to vacate the probationary order for noncompliance.(5) Restore or reissue, in the board's discretion, a suspended license and impose a disciplinary or corrective measure that the board may have imposed.Section 704. Suspensions and revocations.A suspension or revocation shall be made only in accordance with the regulations of the board and only by majority vote of the members of the board after a full and fair hearing. An action of the board shall be taken subject to the right of notice, hearing and adjudication, and the right of appeal, in accordance with the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure). The board, by majority action and in accordance with the board's regulations, may reissue a license which has been suspended. If a license has been revoked, the board shall reinstate a license in accordance with section 706.Section 705. Temporary and automatic suspensions.(a) Temporary suspensions.--A license issued under this act may be temporarily suspended under circumstances determined by 20250SB0395PN0442 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board to be an immediate and clear danger to public health or safety or property. The board shall issue an order to that effect without a hearing, but upon due notice to the licensee at the licensee's last known address that shall include a written statement of all allegations against the licensee. The provisions of section 704 do not apply to temporary suspension. The board shall commence formal action to suspend, revoke or restrict the license of the individual under this act. All actions shall be taken promptly and without delay. Within 30 days following the issuance of an order temporarily suspending a license, the board shall conduct or cause to be conducted a preliminary hearing to determine that there is a prima facie case supporting the suspension. The individual whose license has been temporarily suspended may be present at the preliminary hearing and may be represented by counsel, cross-examine witnesses, inspect physical evidence, call witnesses, offer evidence and testimony and make a record of the proceedings. If it is determined that there is not a prima facie case, the suspended license shall be immediately restored. The temporary suspension shall remain in effect until vacated by the board, but in no event longer than 180 days.(b) Commitment of licensee.--(1) A license issued under this act shall automatically be suspended:(i) Upon the legal commitment of a licensee to an institution because of mental incompetency from any cause and upon filing with the board a certified copy of the commitment.(ii) Upon conviction of a felony or conviction of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, that, if 20250SB0395PN0442 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony.(2) Automatic suspension under this subsection may not be stayed pending an appeal of a conviction. Restoration of the license shall be made as provided in the case of revocation or suspension of a license.Section 706. Reinstatement of license.Unless ordered to do so by Commonwealth Court or an appeal from Commonwealth Court, the board may not reinstate the license of an individual whose license has been revoked. An individual whose license has been revoked may reapply for a license after a period of at least five years but must meet all of the licensing requirements of this act.Section 707. Surrender of suspended or revoked license.The board shall require an individual whose license has been suspended or revoked to return the license in a manner that the board directs. Failure to do so, and upon conviction of failure to return the license, shall be a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 708. Injunction.Whenever, in the judgment of the board, a person has engaged in an act or practice that constitutes or will constitute a violation of this act, the board or its agents may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining the act or practice. Based on a showing by the board that the person has engaged or is about to engage in a prohibited act or practice, an injunction, restraining order or other order, as may be appropriate, may be granted by the court. The remedy by injunction is in addition to any other civil or criminal penalty.Section 709. Subpoenas and oaths.20250SB0395PN0442 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authority granted.--The board shall have the authority to issue subpoenas, upon application of an attorney responsible for representing the Commonwealth in disciplinary matters before the board, for the purpose of investigating alleged violations of the act or a regulation of the board. The board shall have the power to subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, examine witnesses and take testimony or compel the production of books, records, papers and documents as the board may deem necessary or proper in and pertinent to a proceeding, investigation or hearing held by the board. The board is authorized to apply to Commonwealth Court to enforce the board's subpoenas. Commonwealth Court may impose limitations in the scope of the subpoena as are necessary to prevent unnecessary intrusion into client confidential information.(b) Disciplinary matters.--An attorney responsible for representing the Commonwealth in disciplinary matters before the board shall notify the board immediately upon receiving notification of an alleged violation of this act or a regulation of the board. The board shall maintain current records of the reported alleged violations and periodically review the records for the purpose of determining that each alleged violation has been resolved in a timely manner.CHAPTER 9MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 901. Municipalities.(a) Municipal licenses not required and exceptions.--Licensure under this act shall be acceptable to a municipality in this Commonwealth as proof of competence to perform plumbing services, and no municipality may require an individual licensed under this act to obtain an additional license to perform 20250SB0395PN0442 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plumbing services.(b) Certain powers preserved.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent a municipality from:(1) Inspecting plumbing services or regulating the manner in which plumbing services are performed in compliance with the current Commonwealth plumbing code or applicable municipal plumbing code.(2) Levying lawful taxes and fees.(3) Requiring the purchase of a business privilege license that is unrelated to demonstrating competence in the performance of plumbing services.(4) Denying or revoking local permits for failure to comply with ordinances.(c) Plumbing construction standards.--Nothing in this act authorizes the board or a municipality to adopt plumbing construction standards except within the relevant provisions of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act. Nothing in this act authorizes the board or a municipality to adopt a standard or regulation of propane, propane distributors or installation of propane-related systems or appliances which differs or conflicts with sections 15 and 16 of the act of June 19, 2002 (P.L.421, No.61), known as the Propane and Liquefied Petroleum Gas Act.Section 902. Appropriation.The sum of $250,000, or as much of that amount as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the department for the payment of costs associated with processing and renewing licenses, for the operation of the board and for other costs associated with this act. The appropriation shall be repaid by the department within three years of the beginning of issuance 20250SB0395PN0442 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of licenses by the board.Section 903. Regulations.Within 18 months of the effective date of this section, the board shall begin to promulgate regulations to carry out this act.Section 904. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 501(c) shall take effect in 30 days.(2) Section 502(a)(4) and (6) shall take effect in 60 days.(3) This section shall take effect immediately.(4) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 18 months.20250SB0395PN0442 - 28 - 12345678910111213